Utah statutes.
30-3-34.   Best interests -- Rebuttable presumption.

(1)  If the parties are unable to agree on a parent-time schedule, the court may establish a parent-time schedule consistent with the best interests of the child.

(2)  The advisory guidelines as provided in Section 30-3-33 and the parent-time schedule as provided in Sections 30-3-35 and 30-3-35.5 shall be presumed to be in the best interests of the child.  The parent-time schedule shall be considered the minimum parent-time to which the noncustodial parent and the child shall be entitled unless a parent can establish otherwise by a preponderance of the evidence that more or less parent-time should be awarded based upon any of the following criteria:

(a) parent-time would endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's emotional development;

(b)  the distance between the residency of the child and the noncustodial parent;

(c)  a substantiated or unfounded allegation of child abuse has been made;

(d)  the lack of demonstrated parenting skills without safeguards to ensure the child's well-being during parent-time;

(e)  the financial inability of the noncustodial parent to provide adequate food and shelter for the child during periods of parent-time;

(f)  the preference of the child if the court determines the child to be of sufficient maturity;

(g)  the incarceration of the noncustodial parent in a county jail, secure youth corrections facility, or an adult corrections facility;

(h)  shared interests between the child and the noncustodial parent;

(i)  the involvement or lack of involvement of the noncustodial parent in the school, community, religious, or other related activities of the child;

(j)  the availability of the noncustodial parent to care for the child when the custodial parent is unavailable to do so because of work or other circumstances;

(k)  a substantial and chronic pattern of missing, canceling, or denying regularly scheduled parent-time;

(l)  the minimal duration of and lack of significant bonding in the parents' relationship prior to the conception of the child;

(m)  the parent-time schedule of siblings;

(n)  the lack of reasonable alternatives to the needs of a nursing child; and

(o)  any other criteria the court determines relevant to the best interests of the child.

(3)  The court shall enter the reasons underlying its order for parent-time that:

(a)  incorporates a parent-time schedule provided in Section 30-3-35 or 30-3-35.5; or

(b)  provides more or less parent-time than a parent-time schedule provided in Section 30-3-35 or 30-3-35.5.

(4)  Once the parent-time schedule has been established, the parties may not alter the schedule except by mutual consent of the parties or a court order.



Amended by Chapter 146, 2008 General Session

